Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3309
Sections, how construed with respect to highways.

Nothing in sections 60-3301 to 60-3311 shall be construed to require the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision thereof to plan, design, construct, maintain, or modify any highway, as defined in section 60-624, for the accommodation of an automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle or a driverless-capable vehicle.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 9.